Georgia statutes. TITLE 32 Highways, Bridges, and Ferries
CHAPTER 7 Abandonment, Disposal, or Leasing of
Property Not Needed for Public
Road Purposes

Cross references.

Condemnation of public and private roads for purposes of constructing electric power plants, §

22-3-20

et seq.

32-7-1.
Authority of department, counties, and municipalities to substitute for, relocate, or abandon public roads.

Whenever deemed in the public interest, the department or a county or a municipality may substitute for, relocate, or abandon any public road that is under its respective jurisdiction, provided that a county or municipality shall first obtain the approval of the department if any expenditure of federal or state funds is required.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-618, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

Law reviews.

For annual survey on local government law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 135 (2014).

32-7-2.
Procedure for abandonment.

Before abandoning any public road on the state highway system, the department shall confer with the governing authority of the counties or municipalities concerned and give due consideration to their wishes in such abandonment; but in case of disagreement the judgment of the department shall prevail.

When it is determined that a section of the state highway system has for any reason ceased to be used by the public to the extent that no substantial public purpose is served by it and after having conferred with the counties and municipalities, the department, by certification signed by the commissioner and accompanied by a plat or sketch, may declare that section of the state highway system abandoned. Thereafter, that section of road shall no longer be a part of the state highway system and the rights of the public in and to the section of road as a public road shall cease.

Prior to certifying the abandonment of a road or section thereof, the department shall give notice of its intentions to the counties or municipalities through which such road passes.

If such county or municipality, by proper resolution, indicates its willingness and desire to take over the road that is proposed to be abandoned and to maintain such road, the certificate of abandonment shall so state; and thereafter the abandoned road shall form part of the county road or municipal street system of the particular county or municipality. Whenever the department abandons a road and a county or a municipality takes over the road, the department shall convey, by quitclaim deed executed by the commissioner, such road to the county or municipality. If the appropriate county or municipality is unwilling to take over the road and maintain it, the property may be disposed of by the department as provided in Code Section 32-7-4, provided that, if the county or municipality has not indicated its desire to take over the road within 30 days after receiving notice, it shall be conclusively presumed that the county or municipality is unwilling to take over the road; and provided, further, that before the department disposes of the abandoned road it shall give 15 days’ notice to the county or municipality, during which time such county or municipality may reconsider its decision and take over the road.

When it is determined that a section of the county road system has for any reason ceased to be used by the public to the extent that no substantial public purpose is served by it or that its removal from the county road system is otherwise in the best public interest, the county, by certification recorded in its minutes, accompanied by a plat or sketch, and, after notice to property owners located thereon, after notice of such determination is published in the newspaper in which the sheriff’s advertisements for the county are published once a week for a period of two weeks, and after a public hearing on such issue, may declare that section of the county road system abandoned. Thereafter, that section of road shall no longer be part of the county road system and the rights of the public in and to the section of road as a public road shall cease.

Prior to certifying the abandonment of a road or section thereof, the county shall give notice of its intention to the municipality into which or through which any part of such road passes.

If such municipality, by proper resolution, indicates its willingness and desire to take over the road that is proposed to be abandoned and to maintain such road, the certification of abandonment shall so state; and thereafter that part of the abandoned road within the municipality shall form part of the municipal street system of the particular municipality. Whenever a county abandons a road and a municipality takes over the road, the county, by quitclaim deed executed by the chairman or presiding officer, shall convey such road to the municipality. If such municipality is unwilling to take over the road and maintain it, the property may be disposed of by the county as provided for in Code Section 32-7-4, provided that, if the municipality has not indicated its desire to take over the road within 30 days after receiving notice, it shall be conclusively presumed the municipality is unwilling to take over the road; and provided, further, that before the county disposes of the abandoned road it shall give 15 days’ notice to the municipality during which time such municipality may reconsider its decision and take over the road.

When it is determined that a section of the municipal street system has for any reason ceased to be used by the public to the extent that no substantial public purpose is served by it or that its removal from the municipal street system is otherwise in the best public interest, the municipality, by certification recorded in its minutes, accompanied by a plat or sketch, and after notice to property owners located thereon, may declare that section of the municipal street system abandoned. Thereafter, that section of road shall no longer be a part of the municipal street system and the rights of the public in and to that section of street as a public road shall cease. The property may be disposed of by the municipality as provided in Code Section 32-7-4.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-619, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 16; Ga. L. 1994, p. 294, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 399, § 1/SB 354.

Law reviews.

For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia local government law for 1978-79, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 155 (1979).

For annual survey on law of real property, see 43 Mercer L. Rev. 353 (1991).

For annual survey article on local government law, see 52 Mercer L. Rev. 341 (2000).

For survey article on local government law for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 353 (2003).

For article, “Administrative Law,” see 63 Mercer L. Rev. 47 (2011).

For annual survey on local government law, see 66 Mercer L. Rev. 135 (2014).

32-7-3.
Authority of department, counties, and municipalities to dispose of property no longer needed for public road purposes.

Whenever any property has been acquired in any manner by the department, a county, or a municipality for public road purposes and thereafter the department, county, or municipality determines that all or any part of the property or any interest therein is no longer needed for such purposes because of changed conditions, the department or the county or municipality is authorized to dispose of such property or such interest therein in accordance with Code Section 32-7-4. Any disposition of property acquired for utility relocation, as provided for in Code Section 32-6-172, or on which utilities are located shall not be subject to Code Section 32-7-4; and no provision of this title shall be construed to prevent the department from conveying to the federal government land or interests in land acquired for federal parkways in Georgia, as provided in Article 2 of Chapter 3 of this title.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-620, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1.

32-7-4.
Procedure for disposition of property.

In disposing of property, as authorized under Code Section 32-7-3, the department, a county, or a municipality, provided that such department, county, or municipality has held title to the property for no more than 30 years, shall notify the owner of such property at the time of its acquisition or, if the tract from which the department, a county, or a municipality acquired its property has been subsequently sold, shall notify the owner of abutting land holding title through the owner from whom the department, a county, or a municipality acquired its property. In the event that all or a portion of the property subject to disposition is a roadway located in a subdivision with a duly formed property owner’s association, the notice for that roadway portion of the property within such subdivision may be provided to the association in lieu of the individual owners of abutting land. The notice shall be in writing delivered to the appropriate owner or association or by publication if the owner’s or association’s address is unknown; and the owner or the association, as applicable, shall have the right to acquire, as provided in this subsection, the property with respect to which the notice is given. Publication, if necessary, shall be in a newspaper of general circulation in the county where the property is located. If, after a search of the available public records, the address of any interested party cannot be found, a record of the facts and reciting the steps taken to establish the address of any such person shall be placed in the department, county, or municipal records and shall be accepted in lieu of service of notice by mailing the same to the last known address of such person. After properly completing and documenting the search, the department, county, or municipality may dispose of the property in accordance with the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section.

When an entire parcel acquired by the department, a county, or a municipality, or any interest therein, is being disposed of, it may be acquired under the right created in paragraph (1) of this subsection at such price as may be agreed upon, but in no event less than the price paid for its acquisition. When only remnants or portions of the original acquisition are being disposed of, they may be acquired for a price no less than 15 percent under the market value thereof at the time the department, county, or municipality decides the property is no longer needed. The department shall use a real estate appraiser with knowledge of the local real estate market who is licensed in Georgia to establish the fair market value of the property prior to listing such property.

The provisions of subparagraph (A) of this paragraph notwithstanding, if the value of the property is $75,000.00 or less as determined by department estimate, the department, county, or municipality may negotiate the sale.

If the right of acquisition is not exercised within 30 days after due notice, the department, county, or municipality may proceed to sell such property as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section.

When the department, county, or municipality in good faith and with reasonable diligence attempted to ascertain the identity of persons entitled to notice under this Code section and mailed such notice to the last known address of record of those persons or otherwise complied with the notification requirements of this Code section, the failure to in fact notify those persons entitled thereto shall not invalidate any subsequent disposition of property pursuant to this Code section.

Unless a sale of the property is made pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection, such sale shall be made to the bidder submitting the highest of the sealed bids received after public advertisement for such bids for two weeks. If the highest of the sealed bids received is less than but within 15 percent of the established market value, the department may accept that bid and convey the property in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section. The department or the county or municipality shall have the right to reject any and all bids, in its discretion, to readvertise, or to abandon the sale.

Such public advertisement shall be inserted once a week in such newspapers or other publication, or both, as will ensure adequate publicity, the first insertion to be at least two weeks prior to the opening of bids, the second to follow one week after the first publication. Such advertisement shall include but not be limited to the following items:

A description sufficient to enable the public to identify the property;

The time and place for submission and opening of sealed bids;

The right of the department or the county or municipality to reject any one or all of the bids;

All the conditions of sale; and

Such further information as the department or the county or municipality may deem advisable as in the public interest.

Such sale of property may be made by the department or a county or municipality by listing the property through a real estate broker licensed under Chapter 40 of Title 43 who has a place of business located in the state. Property shall be listed for a period of at least 30 days. The department shall use a real estate appraiser with knowledge of the local real estate market who is licensed in Georgia to establish the fair market value of the property prior to listing such property. If the highest offer received to purchase is less than the appraised value but within 15 percent of such value, the department, county, or municipality may accept such offer and convey the property in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section. All sales shall be approved by the commissioner on behalf of the department or shall be approved by the governing authority of the county or municipality at a regular meeting that shall be open to the public, and public comments shall be allowed at such meeting regarding such sale.

Commencing at the time of the listing of the property as provided in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, the department, county, or municipality shall provide for a notice to be inserted once a week for two weeks in the legal organ of the county indicating the names of real estate brokers listing the property for the political subdivision. The department, county, or municipality may advertise in newspapers, on the Internet, or in magazines relating to the sale of real estate or similar publications.

The department, county, or municipality shall have the right to reject any and all offers, in its discretion, and to sell such property pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Such sale of property may be made by the department, a county, or a municipality to the highest bidder at a public auction conducted by an auctioneer licensed under Chapter 6 of Title 43. If the highest offer received to purchase is less than the appraised value but within 15 percent of such value, the department, county, or municipality may accept such offer and convey the property in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section.

The department, county, or municipality shall provide for a notice to be inserted once a week for the two weeks immediately preceding the auction in the legal organ of the county including, at a minimum, the following items:

A description sufficient to enable the public to identify the property;

The time and place of the public auction;

The right of the department or the county or municipality to reject any one or all of the bids;

All the conditions of sale; and

Such further information as the department or the county or municipality may deem advisable as in the public interest.

The department, county, or municipality may advertise in magazines relating to the sale of real estate or similar publications.

The department, county, or municipality shall have the right to reject any and all offers, in its discretion, and to sell such property pursuant to the provisions of paragraph (1) or (2) of this subsection.

Any conveyance of property shall require the approval of the department, county, or municipality, by approval of the commissioner on behalf of the department and, in the case of a county or municipality, by resolution, to be recorded in the minutes of its meeting. If the department or the county or municipality approves a sale of property, the commissioner, chairperson, or presiding officer may execute a quitclaim deed conveying such property to the purchaser. All proceeds arising from such sales shall be paid into and constitute a part of the funds of the seller.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-621, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1422, § 16A; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1195, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 726, § 1/SB 444; Ga. L. 2009, p. 8, § 32/SB 46; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1072, § 3/SB 169; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1358, § 1/HB 477; Ga. L. 2018, p. 372, § 6/SB 445.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, inserted “a price no less than 15 percent under” in the middle of the second sentence of subparagraph (a)(2)(A); substituted the present provisions of subparagraph (b)(2)(A) for the former provisions, which read: “Such sale of property may be made by the department or a county or municipality by listing the property through a real estate broker licensed under Chapter 40 of Title 43 who has a place of business located in the county where the property is located or outside the county if no such business is located in the county where the property is located. Property shall be listed for a period of at least three months. Such property shall not be sold at less than its fair market value. The department shall use a real estate appraiser with knowledge of the local real estate market who is licensed in Georgia to establish the fair market value of the property prior to listing such property. All sales shall be approved by the commissioner on behalf of the department or shall be approved by the governing authority of the county or municipality at a regular meeting that shall be open to the public, and public comments shall be allowed at such meeting regarding such sale.”; inserted “newspapers, on the Internet, or in” in the middle of subparagraph (b)(2)(B); and substituted “If the highest offer received to purchase is less than the appraised value but within 15 percent of such value, the department, county, or municipality may accept such offer and convey the property in accordance with the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section” for “Such property shall not be sold at less than its fair market value” in subparagraph (b)(3)(A).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1995, “paragraph” was substituted for “paragraphs” in subparagraph (b)(1)(A).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, “paragraph (1) of this subsection” was substituted for “the preceding paragraph” in the first sentence of paragraph (a)(2).

Law reviews.

For survey article on real property law, see 67 Mercer L. Rev. 193 (2015).

32-7-5.
Leasing property not needed for public road purposes.

In order that any interest in real property acquired for public road or other transportation purposes may be used most economically, the department, counties, or municipalities, in addition to the authority granted in Code Section 32-7-3 to dispose of property no longer needed and in subsection (b) of Code Section 32-3-3 to exchange property, may, notwithstanding Article 2 of Chapter 16 of Title 50, the “State Properties Code,” improve, use, maintain, or lease any interest in property acquired for public road or other transportation purposes that is not presently needed for such purposes.

If the department, a county, or municipality decides to lease any such property or interest therein, the owner of such property at the time of its acquisition or his successor in interest shall have the right to lease such property at an appraised fair market value to be determined by the department, county, or municipality for such period of time until the property is needed for public road or other transportation purposes. However, if at the time of acquisition such property was leased to a tenant, the tenant, instead of the owner or his successor in interest, shall have the first right to lease such property at the appraised fair market value. If the owner, his successor in interest, or the tenant of the property does not lease such property, the department, county, or municipality shall have the right to lease such property at a price equal to the highest sealed public bid, if the bid is acceptable to the department, county, or municipality, for such period of time until the property is needed for public road or other transportation purposes. If no bids or bids which are insufficient are received, the department, county, or municipality may readvertise for new public bids. The department, county, or municipality may negotiate a lease with any state or federal agency, county, or municipality without the aforesaid requirement of sealed bids or leasing to the former owner. The department, county, or municipality shall have the right to impose reasonable restrictions, terms, or conditions on the use of such leased property.

Separate and distinct from the department’s authority to lease property in subsection (b) of this Code section, the department has the authority to negotiate a lease of any property contained within the rights of way of any nonlimited-access public road and not presently needed for public road purposes or rights of way under bridges or viaducts on limited-access public roads and not presently needed for public road purposes. If the department decides to lease any such property, the property shall be leased, at an appraised fair market value to be determined by the department, to the owner or the lessee of the property adjacent to the department’s rights of way for the purposes of parking. Such property shall only be used for the purposes of providing parking and shall not be subleased without the department’s prior approval. Plans for the use of said property must be submitted to and approved by the department prior to any construction. Regardless of any financial expenditures by the lessee, no lease granted under this subsection shall merge into and become a property interest of the lessee or a sublessee. The department shall reserve the right to terminate any lease without cause upon 30 days’ written notice to the lessee. Notwithstanding any provisions of Code Section 48-2-17, all net revenues derived from the lease of any of the department’s property used for the purposes of providing parking shall be utilized by the department to offset the cost of maintaining the public roads of the state.

Unless said property or interest therein is leased to a tax-exempt person or body, it shall be subject to all applicable taxes, both real and personal.

The department or any county or municipality may negotiate a lease with any state or federal agency, county, or municipality for the use of the property for any purpose for which the agency, county, or municipality may put property it owns in fee and without complying with the requirement for sealed bids or leasing to the former owner contained in this Code section.

History.

Code 1933, § 95A-622, enacted by Ga. L. 1973, p. 947, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 775, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1431, § 2.